Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-4628
Resolution of intent.

A city proposing to acquire a gas system through the exercise of the power of eminent domain shall initiate the process by ordering the preparation of a resolution of intent to pursue condemnation of the gas system in accordance with the requirements of the Municipal Natural Gas System Condemnation Act by a vote of a majority of the members of the governing body of the city.

Laws 2002, LB 384, § 5.